Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska8-337
Insolvency; reorganization; surrender of assets by Department of Banking and Finance.

If at the special meeting of the shareholders they shall vote to reorganize such association, the Department of Banking and Finance, upon the consummation of the reorganization thereof, and the approval of the department, shall turn over to the new management all the books, papers and effects of every description in its hands belonging to such association.

Laws 1899, c. 17, § 19d, p. 96;

R.S.1913, § 507;

Laws 1919, c. 190, tit. V, art. XIX, § 23, p. 733;

C.S.1922, § 8105;

C.S.1929, § 8-322;

R.S.1943, § 8-337.